Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 7 CONTROL OF SOIL EROSION AND SEDIMENTATION
12-7-7. Permit or notice of intent required for land-disturbing activities; approval of application and issuance of permit; denial of permit; bond requirement.

No land-disturbing activities shall be conducted in this state, except those land-disturbing activities provided for in Code Section 12-7-17, without the operator first securing a permit from a local issuing authority or providing notice of intent to the division as required by this Code section.

In those counties, municipalities, and service areas for water or water and sewer authorities which are certified as local issuing authorities pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8:

The application for such permit shall be made to and the permit shall be issued by the governing authority of the county wherein such land-disturbing activities are to occur, in the event that such activities will occur outside the corporate limits of a municipality;

In those instances where such activities will occur within the corporate limits of any municipality, the application for such permit shall be made to and the permit shall be issued by the governing authority of the municipality in which such land-disturbing activities are to occur;

In those instances where such activities will occur within the service area of a water authority or water and sewer authority, the application of such permit shall be made to and the permit shall be issued by such authority in which such land-disturbing activities are to occur within the authority's service area; and

The local issuing authority shall conduct inspections and enforce the permits it issues.

In those counties, municipalities, and service areas for water or water and sewer authorities which are not certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8, the terms of the state general permit shall apply, those terms shall be enforced by the division, and no individual land-disturbing activity permit under this Code section will be required; provided, however, that notice of intent shall be submitted to the division prior to commencement of any land-disturbing activities under the state general permit in any of such uncertified counties, municipalities, and service areas for water or water and sewer authorities.

Fees assessed pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-5-23 shall be calculated and paid by the primary permittee as defined in the state general permit for each acre of land-disturbing activity included in the planned development or each phase of development.

In a jurisdiction that is certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8, half of any such fees levied shall be submitted by the applicant to the local issuing authority and half of such fees shall be submitted to the division; except that any and all fees due from an entity which is required to give notice pursuant to paragraph (9) or (10) of Code Section 12-7-17 shall be submitted in full to the division, regardless of the existence of a local issuing authority in the jurisdiction. In a jurisdiction where there is no local issuing authority, the full fee shall be submitted to the division.

Except as provided in this subsection, no permit shall be issued pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section unless the erosion and sediment control plan has been approved by the appropriate district as is required by Code Section 12-7-10. When the jurisdiction or entity that is certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8 lying within the boundaries of the district demonstrates capabilities to review and approve an erosion and sediment control plan and requests an agreement with the district to conduct such review and approval, the district, with the concurrence of the commission, shall enter into an agreement which allows the jurisdiction or entity that is certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8 to conduct review and approval without referring the application and plan to the district, if such jurisdiction or entity that is certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8 meets the conditions specified by the district as set forth in the agreement. A district may not enter into an agreement authorized in this Code section with any jurisdiction or entity that is not certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8.

If a permit applicant has had two or more violations of previous permits or this Code section within three years prior to the date of filing of the application under consideration, the local issuing authority may deny the permit application.

The local issuing authority may require the permit applicant to post a bond in the form of government security, cash, irrevocable letter of credit, or any combination thereof up to, but not exceeding, $3,000.00 per acre of the proposed land-disturbing activity, prior to issuing the permit. If the applicant does not comply with this Code section or with the conditions of the permit after issuance, the local issuing authority may call the bond or any part thereof to be forfeited and may use the proceeds to hire a contractor to stabilize the site of the land-disturbing activity and bring it into compliance. This subsection shall not apply unless there is in effect an ordinance or statute specifically providing for hearing and judicial review of any determination or order of the local issuing authority with respect to alleged permit violations.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 7; Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, § 5; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 26; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1295, § 4; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1650, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5; Ga. L. 2020, p. 488, § 2/SB 445.)

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, substituted "counties, municipalities, and service areas for water or water and sewer authorities" for "counties and municipalities" in subsection (b); deleted "and" at the end of paragraph (b)(2); added paragraph (b)(3) and redesignated former paragraph (b)(3) as present paragraph (b)(4); in subsection (c), substituted "counties, municipalities, and service areas for water or water and sewer authorities" for "counties and municipalities" and substituted "counties, municipalities, and service areas for water or water and sewer authorities" for "counties or municipalities" at the end; in subsection (e), substituted "jurisdiction or entity that is certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8" for "governing authority of a county or municipality", substituted "jurisdiction or entity that is certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8" for "governing authority" twice in the second sentence, and substituted "any jurisdiction or entity that" for "the governing authority of any county or municipality which" in the third sentence.

Cross references.

- Powers of the commission generally,

§

2-6-27

.

Powers of districts generally,

§

2-6-33

.

12-7-7.1. Erosion and sediment control plan prepared; completion; implementation.

As used in this Code section, the term "contractor" means the individual, firm, corporation, or combination thereof or governmental organization contracting with the Department of Transportation or State Road and Tollway Authority for the performance of prescribed work.

In addition to the requirements of Code Section 12-7-6, the Department of Transportation or the State Road and Tollway Authority after July 1, 2003, shall not contract for land-disturbing activity on any construction or maintenance project that will disturb one or more contiguous acres of land until an erosion and sediment control plan for such project has been prepared and accepted pursuant to this Code section.

Through its own forces or by means of the acquisition of professional service pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 22 of Title 50, the Department of Transportation or the State Road and Tollway Authority shall be responsible for the preparation of an erosion and sediment control plan for any construction or maintenance project as required by paragraph (1) of this subsection. Any consultant providing such professional service shall be prequalified by the Department of Transportation as a responsible bidder for the design of erosion and sediment control plans. The division shall assist the Department of Transportation in developing the prequalification approval process for purposes of this subsection.

Upon completion of a proposed plan, the same shall be submitted to the division for review and comment as required by the state general permit.

All bidders for any construction or maintenance project subject to this Code section shall review and submit with their bid proposal a cost estimate as a separate bid for the implementation of the plan, it being understood that the contractor may utilize either its own personnel and resources, qualified subcontractors, or both for implementation of the plan. All contractors and subcontractors for such project shall be prequalified by the Department of Transportation as a responsible bidder for the installation of erosion and sediment control devices in accordance with a plan. The division shall assist the Department of Transportation in developing the prequalification approval process for purposes of this subsection.

The contractor for a construction or maintenance project subject to this Code section shall be responsible for implementing the plan on the awarded project. Payment to any contractor under any contract for implementing any part or all of any plan shall not be on a lump sum basis; rather, such payment shall be based upon unit prices for specific quantities of work performed pursuant to the approved erosion and sediment control plan plus any additional quantities of completed work necessitated by project conditions affecting erosion and sediment control, including without limitation soil types and weather conditions. Charges for all maintenance and cleaning of erosion and sediment control devices shall likewise be paid on a unit price basis.

Through the services of independent consultants, contractors, or subcontractors, or by its own forces, the Department of Transportation shall monitor the water quality and inspect the installation and maintenance of the best management practices in accordance with the plan. All such consultants, contractors, or subcontractors shall be prequalified by the Department of Transportation as a responsible bidder for the inspection of such best management practices and shall have the necessary expertise to determine that such practices are being installed and maintained in accordance with the plan. The division shall assist the Department of Transportation in developing the prequalification approval process for purposes of this subsection.

Proper design, installation, and maintenance of best management practices shall constitute a complete defense to any action by the director or to any other allegation of noncompliance with paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-6.

If deficiencies in the plan or installation or maintenance of best management practices are discovered during the inspection, the Department of Transportation or the State Road and Tollway Authority shall determine the appropriate corrective action. Further, the Department of Transportation or State Road and Tollway Authority may require the consultant to amend the plan or the contractor to change its procedures by change order or supplemental agreement in order to institute such changes as may be necessary to correct any errors or deficiencies in the plan, the implementation of the plan, or the maintenance of the best management practices.

The division, the Department of Transportation, or the State Road and Tollway Authority shall control or coordinate the work of its employees inspecting any project so as to prevent any delay of, interference with, or hindrance to any contractor performing land-disturbing activity on any project subject to the provisions of this Code section.

There shall be an Erosion and Sediment Control Overview Council which shall approve the Manual for Erosion and Sediment Control in Georgia prior to publication by the commission. In addition, the council shall provide guidance on the best management practices for implementing any erosion and sediment control plan for purposes of this Code section. The council shall be composed of nine members, including one member of the House of Representatives who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and serve at the pleasure thereof; one member of the Senate who shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor and serve at the pleasure thereof; and seven members who shall be appointed by the Governor and serve at the pleasure thereof, including one employee each from the Department of Transportation, the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources, and the State Road and Tollway Authority, a professional engineer licensed to practice in this state from a private engineering consulting firm practicing environmental engineering, one representative of the highway contracting industry certified by the Department of Transportation, one representative of the electric utility industry, and a chairperson. The council shall meet prior to December 1, 2015, to approve the most current version of the manual and at all other times as necessary to approve any subsequent changes or updates to the manual prior to its implementation. Such meetings shall be held at the call of the chairperson. Each councilmember shall receive a daily allowance in the amount specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21; provided, however, that any full-time state employee serving on the council shall draw no compensation but shall receive necessary expenses. The commissioner is authorized to pay such compensation and expenses from department funds.

The council may develop recommendations governing the preparation of plans and the installation and maintenance of best management practices. If a dispute concerning the requirements of this Code section should arise, the Erosion and Sediment Control Overview Council shall mediate the dispute.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to affect the division's authority under Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title, the "Georgia Water Quality Control Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-7-7.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1673, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 2-1; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 317, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5; Ga. L. 2015, p. 35, § 4/HB 397.)

Cross references.

- Powers and duties of Department of Transportation,

§

32-2-2

.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, "Transportation" was substituted for "Transporation" in paragraph (b)(2).

12-7-8. Certification of locality as local issuing authority; periodic review; procedure for revoking certification; enforcement actions.

If a county or municipality has enacted ordinances which meet or exceed the standards, requirements, and provisions of this chapter and the state general permit, except that the standards, requirements, and provisions of the ordinances for monitoring, reporting, inspections, design standards, turbidity standards, education and training, and project size thresholds with regard to education and training requirements shall not exceed the state general permit requirements, and which are enforceable by such county or municipality, and if a county or municipality documents that it employs or contracts with qualified personnel to implement enacted ordinances, the director shall certify such county or municipality as a local issuing authority for the purposes of this chapter.

A local issuing authority shall regulate both primary and secondary permittees as such terms are defined in the state general permit. Primary permittees shall be responsible for installation and maintenance of best management practices where the primary permittee is conducting land-disturbing activities. Secondary permittees shall be responsible for installation and maintenance of best management practices where the secondary permittee is conducting land-disturbing activities. A local issuing authority must review, revise, or amend its ordinances within 12 months of any amendment to this chapter.

Any land-disturbing activities by a local issuing authority shall be subject to the same requirements of the ordinances such local issuing authority adopted pursuant to this chapter as are applied to private persons, and the division shall enforce such requirements upon the local issuing authority.

If a local issuing authority certified by the director under paragraph (1) of this subsection has within its jurisdiction an area served by a water authority or water and sewer authority which has been authorized by local law to be responsible for storm-water management and to implement and enforce all relevant ordinances and regulations and, pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement with the governing authority of a county or municipality, operates a storm-water utility and maintains the storm-water management system and soil erosion and sedimentation control permitting, inspection, and enforcement within such county or municipality, such water authority or water and sewer authority may, in the sole discretion of the director, be certified as the local issuing authority for the county or municipality which it serves.

In the event that a water authority or water and sewer authority serves more than one county or municipality that is a local issuing authority certified by the director under paragraph (1) of this subsection, such water authority or water and sewer authority must have authority to implement and enforce all relevant ordinances and regulations from and an intergovernmental agreement with every applicable county or municipality before the director may certify such water authority or water and sewer authority as a local issuing authority for any county or municipality which it serves.

In the event that a water authority or water and sewer authority serves less than an entire county or municipality that is a local issuing authority certified by the director under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the intergovernmental agreement described under this paragraph shall specify the jurisdictional boundaries within which the water authority or water and sewer authority shall act as the local issuing authority.

The districts or the commission or both shall review semi-annually the actions of jurisdictions and entities which have been certified as local issuing authorities pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section. The districts or the commission or both may provide technical assistance to any jurisdiction or entity for the purpose of improving the effectiveness of the jurisdiction's or entity's erosion and sedimentation control program. The districts or the commission shall notify the division and request investigation by the division if any deficient or ineffective local program is found.

The board, on or before December 31, 2003, shall promulgate rules and regulations setting forth the requirements and standards for certification and the procedures for decertification of a local issuing authority. The division may periodically review the actions of jurisdictions and entities which have been certified as local issuing authorities pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section. Such review may include, but shall not be limited to, review of the administration and enforcement of and compliance with the applicable ordinances and regulations and review of conformance with an agreement, if any, between the district and the local issuing authority. If such review indicates that the jurisdiction or entity certified pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section has not administered, enforced, or complied with its ordinances or regulations or has not conducted the program in accordance with subsection (e) of Code Section 12-7-7, the division shall notify that jurisdiction or entity in writing. The jurisdiction or entity so notified shall have 90 days within which to take the necessary corrective action to retain certification as a local issuing authority. If the jurisdiction or entity does not take necessary corrective action within 90 days after notification by the division, the division shall revoke the certification of the jurisdiction or entity as a local issuing authority.

The director may determine that the public interest requires initiation of an enforcement action by the division. Where such a determination is made and the local issuing authority has failed to secure compliance, the director may implement the board's rules and seek compliance under provisions of Code Sections 12-7-12 through 12-7-15. For purposes of this subsection, enforcement actions taken by the division pursuant to Code Sections 12-7-12 through 12-7-15 shall not require prior revocation of certification of the jurisdiction or entity as a local issuing authority.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 12; Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, § 8; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1224, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 27; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1295, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1650, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 150, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5; Ga. L. 2007, p. 127, § 2/HB 463; Ga. L. 2019, p. 606, § 3/HB 493; Ga. L. 2020, p. 488, § 3/SB 445.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in paragraph (a)(1), inserted "or contracts with" and substituted "shall certify" for "may certify" near the end; and deleted "any agreement entered into pursuant to" preceding "subsection (e) of Code Section 12-7-7" near the end of the fourth sentence of subsection (c).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, substituted "jurisdiction or entity" for "county or municipality" throughout this Code section; added paragraph (a)(4); in subsection (b), substituted "jurisdictions and entities" for "counties and municipalities" in the first sentence and substituted "jurisdiction's or entity's" for "county's or municipality's" in the second sentence; in subsection (c) substituted "jurisdictions and entities" for "counties and municipalities", substituted "the applicable" for "a governing authority's", inserted "and regulations", and substituted "the local issuing authority" for "the governing local issuing authority" in the third sentence; substituted "jurisdiction or entity" for "governing authority of any county or municipality", inserted "or regulations", and substituted "that jurisdiction or entity in" for "the governing authority of the county or municipality" in the fourth sentence; and substituted "jurisdiction or entity" for "governing authority of the county or municipality" in the fifth sentence.

Cross references.

- Powers of the commission generally,

§

2-6-27

.

Powers of districts generally,

§

2-6-33

.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2019, p. 606,

§

1/HB 493, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Private Permitting Review and Inspection Act.'"

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982).

12-7-9. Applications for permits; erosion and sediment control plans and data; time for issuance or denial.

Applications for permits shall be submitted in accordance with this chapter and the rules and regulations, ordinances, and resolutions adopted pursuant to this chapter. Such applications shall be accompanied by the applicant's erosion and sediment control plans and by such supportive data as will affirmatively demonstrate that the land-disturbing activity proposed will be carried out in such a manner that the minimum requirements set forth in Code Section 12-7-6 shall be met. All applications shall contain a certification stating that the plan preparer or the designee thereof visited the site prior to creation of the plan or that such a visit was not required in accordance with rules and regulations established by the board.

No permit shall be issued to any applicant unless the local issuing authority affirmatively determines that the plan embracing such activities meets the requirements of Code Section 12-7-6. All applicable fees shall be paid prior to issuance of the land disturbance permit by the local issuing authority.

Permits shall be issued or denied as soon as practicable after the application therefor has been filed with the local issuing authority, but in any event not later than 45 days thereafter.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1295, § 6; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

12-7-10. Referral of application and plan to district; time for action.

Except as otherwise provided by Code Section 12-7-7, immediately upon receipt of an application for a permit the application and plan for sediment and erosion control shall be referred to the appropriate district wherein such land-disturbing activities are proposed to take place, for its review and approval or disapproval concerning the adequacy of the erosion and sediment control plan proposed by the applicant. A district shall approve or disapprove a plan within 35 days of receipt. Failure of a district to act within 35 days shall be considered an approval of the pending plan.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 9; Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, § 6; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

Cross references.

- Powers of districts generally,

§

2-6-33

.

12-7-11. Statement of reasons for denial of permit required; conditions for approval; suspension, revocation, or modification of permit.

Within the time specified by Code Section 12-7-9, the local issuing authority shall issue or deny the permit. The local issuing authority, upon denial of a permit, shall state its reasons for the denial, setting forth specifically wherein such application is found to be deficient. Any land-disturbing activity permitted under this chapter shall be carried out in accordance with this chapter and the ordinance, resolution, or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this chapter. The local issuing authority shall specify on the permit the conditions under which the activity may be undertaken.

The permit may be suspended, revoked, or modified by the local issuing authority, as to all or any portion of the land affected by the plan, upon a finding that the holder or his or her successor in title is not in compliance with the approved erosion and sediment control plan or that the holder or his or her successor in title is in violation of this chapter or any ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation adopted or promulgated pursuant to this chapter. A holder of a permit shall notify any successor in title to him or her as to all or any portion of the land affected by the approved plan of the conditions contained in the permit.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 10; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1295, § 7; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

12-7-12. Orders directed to violators; stop work order procedures.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this chapter, any rule or regulation of the board, or any order of the director has occurred in a county or municipality which is not certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8, the director may issue an order directed to such violator or violators. The order shall specify the provisions of this chapter or the rules or regulations or order alleged to have been violated and may require that land-disturbing activity be stopped until necessary corrective action and mitigation have been taken or may require that necessary corrective action and mitigation be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in the order. Any order issued by the director under this Code section shall be signed by the director. Any such order shall become final unless the person or persons named therein request, in writing, a hearing pursuant to Code Section 12-7-16.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, whenever a local issuing authority has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of a local ordinance or resolution has occurred within the jurisdiction of the local issuing authority, the local issuing authority may require that land-disturbing activity be stopped until necessary corrective action and mitigation have been taken or may require that necessary corrective action and mitigation be taken within a reasonable time.

The following procedures shall apply to the issuances of stop work orders:

For the first and second violations of the provisions of this chapter, the director or the local issuing authority shall issue a written warning to the violator. The violator shall have five days to correct the violation. If the violation is not corrected within five days, the director or local issuing authority shall issue a stop work order requiring that land-disturbing activities be stopped until necessary corrective action or mitigation has occurred; provided, however, that, if the violation presents an imminent threat to public health or waters of the state, the director or local issuing authority shall issue an immediate stop work order in lieu of a warning;

For a third and each subsequent violation, the director or local issuing authority shall issue an immediate stop work order; and

All stop work orders shall be effective immediately upon issuance and shall be in effect until the necessary corrective action or mitigation has occurred.

When a violation of this chapter in the form of taking action without a permit, failure to maintain a stream buffer, or significant amounts of sediment, as determined by the local issuing authority or by the director or his or her designee, have been or are being discharged into state waters and where best management practices have not been properly designed, installed, and maintained, a stop work order shall be issued by the local issuing authority or by the director or his or her designee. All such stop work orders shall be effective immediately upon issuance and shall be in effect until the necessary corrective action or mitigation has occurred. Such stop work orders shall apply to all land-disturbing activity on the site with the exception of the installation and maintenance of temporary or permanent erosion and sediment controls.

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, § 9; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1650, § 6; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1430, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014).

12-7-13. Injunctions.

Whenever, in the judgment of the director, any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or would constitute a violation of this chapter, the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or any order or permit conditions in a county or municipality which is not certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8, he or she may make application to the superior court of the county where such person resides or, if such person is a nonresident of the state, to the superior court of the county in which the violative act or practice has been or is about to be engaged in for an order enjoining such act or practice or for an order requiring compliance with this chapter, the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or the order or permit condition. Upon a showing by the director that such person has engaged in or is about to engage in any such violative act or practice, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing the lack of an adequate remedy at law.

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, § 9; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

12-7-14. Actions to restrain imminent danger; emergency orders; duration of effectiveness of orders.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, upon receipt of evidence that certain land-disturbing activities occurring in a municipality or county which is not certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8 are presenting an imminent and substantial danger to the environment or to the health of humans, the director may bring an action as provided in Code Section 12-7-13 to restrain immediately any person causing or contributing to the danger caused by such land-disturbing activities or to take such other action as may be necessary.

If it is not practicable to assure prompt protection of the environment or the health of humans solely by commencement of such a civil action, the director may issue such emergency orders as may be necessary to protect the environment or the health of humans who are or may be affected by such land-disturbing activities. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, such order shall be immediately effective for a period of not more than 48 hours, unless the director brings an action under subsection (a) of this Code section before the expiration of such period. Whenever the director brings such an action within such period, such order shall be effective for such period of time as may be authorized by the court pending litigation or thereafter.

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, § 9; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

12-7-15. Civil penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or any permit condition or limitation established pursuant to this chapter or who negligently or intentionally fails or refuses to comply with any final or emergency order of the director issued as provided in this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500.00 per day. For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter, notwithstanding any provision in any city charter to the contrary, municipal courts shall be authorized to impose a penalty not to exceed $2,500.00 for each violation. Notwithstanding any limitation of law as to penalties which can be assessed for violations of county ordinances, any magistrate court or any other court of competent jurisdiction trying cases brought as violations of this chapter under county ordinances approved under this chapter shall be authorized to impose penalties for such violations not to exceed $2,500.00 for each violation. Each day during which the violation or failure or refusal to comply continues shall be a separate violation.

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, § 9; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1224, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1295, § 8; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1650, § 7; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1430, § 4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

12-7-16. Hearings and review.

All hearings on and review of contested matters, orders, or permits issued by or filed against the director and all hearings on and review of any other enforcement actions or orders initiated by the director under this chapter shall be provided and conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2. The hearing and review procedure provided in this Code section is to the exclusion of all other means of hearings or review.

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, § 9; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)